Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVIII Witnesses, Evidence, Notaries, Commissioners of Foreign Deeds, and Legal Notices
Matters Required To Be Published

424.220.
Financial statements — Contents — Publication requirements — Exempted officers.

Excepting officers who are exempted under subsection (8) of this section, every public officer of any city, county, or district less than a county, or of any board, commission, or other authority of a city, county, or district whose duty it is to collect, receive, have the custody, control, or disbursement of any funds collected from the public in any form shall, at the expiration of each fiscal year, prepare an itemized, sworn statement of the funds collected, received, held, or disbursed by him or her during the fiscal year just closed, unless he or she has complied with KRS

424.230

.

The statement shall show:

The total amount of funds collected and received during the fiscal year from each individual source; and

The total amount of funds disbursed during the fiscal year to each individual payee. The list shall include only aggregate amounts to vendors exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Only the totals of amounts paid to each individual as salary or commission and public utility bills shall be shown. The amount of salaries paid to all nonelected county employees shall be shown as lump-sum expenditures by category, including but not limited to road department, jails, solid waste, public safety, and administrative personnel.

The financial reporting and publishing requirements for a school district are provided in KRS

160.463

.

The officer shall procure and include in or attach to the financial statement, as a part thereof, a certificate from the cashier or other proper officer of the banks in which the funds are or have been deposited during the past year, showing the balance, if any, of funds to the credit of the officer making the statement.

To provide notice to the public that the city’s financial statement has been completed as required by this section:

The appropriate officer of a city that has performed an audit under KRS

91A.040

for the fiscal year or years, including the appropriate officer of any municipally owned electric, gas, or water system, shall publish the audit report in accordance with KRS

91A.040

(9); and

The appropriate officer of a city that has not conducted an annual audit for the fiscal year under one (1) of the exceptions provided in KRS 91A.040(2), (3), or (4) shall publish a legal display advertisement of not less than six (6) column inches in a newspaper qualified under KRS

424.120

that the statement required by subsection (1) of this section has been prepared and that copies have been provided to each local newspaper of general circulation, each news service, and each local radio and television station which has on file with the city a written request to be provided a statement. The advertisement shall be published within ninety (90) days after the close of the fiscal year.

To provide notice to the public that the county’s financial statement has been completed as required by this section, the appropriate officer of a county shall publish the county’s audit, prepared in accordance with KRS

43.070

or

64.810

, in the same manner that city audits are published in accordance with KRS 91A.040(9).

The provisions of this section shall not apply to officers of:

A city of the first class;

A county containing a city of the first class;

A consolidated local government;

An urban-county government;

A city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census;

A public agency or joint public agency of a:

City of the first class;

Consolidated local government; or

County containing a city of the first class; or

A school district of a:

City of the first class;

Consolidated local government; or

County containing a city of the first class.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 12; 1960, ch. 168, § 1; 1962, ch. 170, § 1; 1976, ch. 71, § 1; 1978, ch. 384, § 526, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 430, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 277, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 32, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 52, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 69, § 79, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 346, § 232, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 8, § 6, effective July 12, 2006; 2011, ch. 46, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2014, ch. 92, § 309, effective January 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 171, § 8, effective April 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 207, § 8, effective April 27, 2018; 2018 ch. 10, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 91, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(8/19/2022). The Reviser of Statutes has corrected an error that occurred during codification of this statute following the enactment of
2018 Ky. Acts chs. 10,
171, and
207.

424.230.
Optional monthly or quarterly statements.

Any officer who is subject to the provisions of KRS

424.220

may elect to prepare and publish monthly or quarterly statements, in lieu of the annual statements required by KRS

424.220

. All of the provisions of KRS 424.220 shall be applicable to such a monthly or quarterly statement except that (1) the statement shall cover only the preceding month or quarter, as the case may be, and (2) the publication shall be made within thirty (30) days after the end of the month or quarter, as the case may be. Any officer who has elected to proceed under this section shall not be exempted from the requirements of KRS 424.220 for any fiscal year unless he has caused to be prepared and published, in accordance with this section, a proper statement for each month or quarter of the fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 13.

424.240.
County or city budget.

Immediately following the adoption of an annual budget by any county or city other than one of the first class or a consolidated local government, the clerk shall cause a summary of the budget or the text of the budget ordinance to be advertised for the county, consolidated local government, or city by publication in a newspaper.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 14; 1960, ch. 168, § 1; 1984, ch. 201, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 346, § 233, effective July 15, 2002.

424.250.
School district budget.

At the same time that copies of the budget of a school district are filed with the clerk of the tax levying authority for the district, as provided in KRS

160.470

, the board of education of the district shall cause the budget to be advertised for the district by publishing a copy of the budget in a newspaper.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 15.

Opinions of Attorney General.

While the amending of KRS

160.470

and the making of each school district their own tax levying authority repeals that part of this section as to filing the budget with a clerk, the other part of the statute calling for the budget to be published in a newspaper is capable of being observed.

OAG 82-603

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

School districts, KRS ch. 160.

424.260.
Bids for materials, supplies, equipment, or services — Exceptions.

Except where a statute specifically fixes a larger sum as the minimum for a requirement of advertisement for bids, no city, county, or district, or board or commission of a city or county, or sheriff or county clerk, may make a contract, lease, or other agreement for:

Materials;

Supplies, except perishable foods such as meat, poultry, fish, egg products, fresh vegetables, and fresh fruits;

Equipment; or

Contractual services other than professional;

involving an expenditure of more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) without first making newspaper advertisement for bids. This subsection shall not apply to the transfer of property between governmental agencies as authorized in KRS 82.083(4)(a).

If the fiscal court requires that the sheriff or county clerk advertise for bids on expenditures of less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), the fiscal court requirement shall prevail.

Nothing in this statute shall limit or restrict the ability of a local school district to acquire supplies and equipment outside of the bidding procedure if those supplies and equipment meet the specifications of the contracts awarded by the Office of Material and Procurement Services in the Office of the Controller within the Finance and Administration Cabinet or a federal, local, or cooperative agency and are available for purchase elsewhere at a lower price. A board of education may purchase those supplies and equipment without advertising for bids if, prior to making the purchases, the board of education obtains certification from the district’s finance or purchasing officer that the items to be purchased meet the standards and specifications fixed by state price contract, federal (GSA) price contract, or the bid of another school district whose bid specifications allow other districts to utilize their bids, and that the sales price is lower than that established by the various price contract agreements or available through the bid of another school district whose bid specifications would allow the district to utilize their bid.

The procedures set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be available to the district for any specific item once the bidding procedure has been initiated by an invitation to bid and a publication of specifications for that specific item has been published. In the event that all bids are rejected, the district may again avail itself of the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection.

This requirement shall not apply in an emergency if the chief executive officer of the city, county, or district has duly certified that an emergency exists, and has filed a copy of the certificate with the chief financial officer of the city, county, or district, or if the sheriff or the county clerk has certified that an emergency exists, and has filed a copy of the certificate with the clerk of the court where his necessary office expenses are fixed pursuant to KRS

64.345

or

64.530

, or if the superintendent of the board of education has duly certified that an emergency exists, and has filed a copy of the certificate with the chief state school officer.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply for the purchase of wholesale electric power for resale to the ultimate customers of a municipal utility organized under KRS

96.550

to

96.900

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 16; 1960, ch. 168, § 1; 1972, ch. 147, § 1; 1974, ch. 97, § 1; 1978, ch. 197, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 282, § 4, effective April 2, 1982; 1990, ch. 95, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 178, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 89, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 5, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 225, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 510, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 696, effective June 20, 2005; 2016 ch. 22, § 5, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 79, § 4, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 150, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

424.270.
Local administrative regulations.

No general regulation of uniform application throughout the publication area promulgated by any officer, board or commission of a city, county, or district, which is intended to impose liabilities or restrictions upon the public shall be valid unless and until it, or a notice of such promulgation, together with a statement where the original regulation may be examined by the public, has been advertised by newspaper publication.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 17; 1960, ch. 168, § 1.

424.280.
Due date of ad valorem taxes.

Every officer whose duty it is to collect any ad valorem tax for the state or for any political subdivision of the state shall cause notice of the due date of the tax to be advertised by newspaper publication, and shall not be given a quietus for the taxes collected unless he submits proof of such publication. Publication of the ordinance passed by a city adopting the rate of the ad valorem tax levy shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this section if the due date of the tax is published as a component of the ordinance levying the tax.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 18; 2016 ch. 22, § 6, effective July 15, 2016.

424.290.
Publication of ballots and supplementary material.

Not less than three (3) days before any primary or regular election the county clerk shall cause to be published in a newspaper a copy of the ballots or supplementary material on which appear the names of candidates or issues to be voted upon. Where the lists of candidates or issues to be voted upon differ for various precincts within the county, the county clerk shall cause to be published only one (1) set of data with appropriate notations showing the differences in the various precincts. If supplemental paper ballots have been approved as provided in KRS

118.215

, the supplemental paper ballot shall be published at the same time as other material required to be published by this subsection. The cost of publication shall be paid by the county, except that the cost of publishing any voting data required to be published by this subsection that is limited to a city election or a district election other than a school district election shall be paid by the city or the district as the case may be.

“Copy,” as used in subsection (1) of this section, means a summary of candidates and issues to be voted upon showing all the pertinent information that will appear, upon which the voters will cast their votes at a particular polling place.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 19; 1960, ch. 168, § 1; 1962, ch. 213, § 1; 1972, ch. 188, § 67, June 16, 1972; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 15; 1978, ch. 384, § 527, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 360, § 84, effective July 15, 1982; 2021 ch. 197, § 71, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section does not require the publication of a facsimile of the ballot in a special election.

OAG 60-255

.

This section requires the publication of the face of the voting machine but does not require publication of a copy of the absentee ballots.

OAG 66-295

.

An abstract or condensed content of the ballot face showing all pertinent or necessary information would be sufficient.

OAG 67-203

.

In the published ballot abstract, the type might be reduced so long as it is sufficiently legible.

OAG 67-203

.

Where the ballot face will differ in various precincts, this section requires the publication of at least separate summaries of each ballot face.

OAG 69-319

.

Where the clerk’s instructions regarding the publication of the election ballot were in error and the printer proceeded with a publication that complied with the provisions of this section, the fiscal court was legally obligated to pay any reasonable printing cost resulting from the publication.

OAG 69-319

.

Subsection (1) of this section does not repeal by implication the provisions of KRS

242.060

.

OAG 71-313

.

424.300.
Public Service Commission hearings.

Notices of hearings by the Public Service Commission upon applications by public utilities for rate increases or reduction or discontinuance of service, except where advertised by mail, shall be advertised by the applicant utility in accordance with such reasonable regulations as the commission may prescribe by newspaper publication in the areas that will be affected.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 20; 1982, ch. 242, § 6, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Public Service Commission, KRS ch. 278.

424.310.
Railroad Commission hearings. [Repealed.]

424.320.
Motor transportation hearings. [Repealed.]

424.330.
Publication of lists of delinquent taxes by cities — Fee allowance.

Cities may publish a list of uncollected delinquent taxes levied under Section 181 of the Kentucky Constitution, showing the name of and the amount due from each delinquent taxpayer, to be advertised by newspaper publication. A fee equal to the prorated cost of publication per taxpayer per publication may be added to the amount of each tax claim published as publication costs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 23; 1988, ch. 32, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 73, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 73, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 8, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 10, § 69, effective January 1, 2010; 2014, ch. 5, § 4, effective July 15, 2014.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Newspapers claiming to have the largest circulation should be required to file with the fiscal court certified statements as to their circulation after which the court can make its selection from the best information available.

OAG 64-399

.

This section does not contemplate the readvertising of tax claims involved in certificates of delinquency, but contemplates the publication of only those delinquent taxes for which no certificates of delinquency were issued and filed.

OAG 67-312

.

The publication requirements of this section are not applicable to delinquent city taxes.

OAG 78-420

; 78-449.

This chapter applies only to those publications required by law to be published. However, an exception under this act is the list of uncollectible delinquent taxes, which must be published pursuant to this section.

OAG 82-128

.

424.340.
Publication of notice of fiduciary appointments and date for presentation of creditors’ claims.

The clerk of the probate court shall, at least once each month, cause to be published in the newspaper meeting the requirements of KRS

424.120

, a notice setting forth all fiduciary appointments made since the last publication and including at least the following information: the name and address of the decedent or ward, the name and address of the fiduciary, the date of the fiduciary’s appointment, and the name and address of the attorney representing the fiduciary, if any, and the date by which claims of creditors must be presented. The clerk may charge each fiduciary a fee not to exceed the actual proportionate cost of said notice. Publication of this notice shall neither enlarge nor reduce the obligation of a creditor to present a timely claim, nor the liability of the fiduciary or distributee to pay the same.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 24; 1960, ch. 168, § 1; 1970, ch. 257, § 5; 1980, ch. 188, § 292, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 259, § 29, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 90, § 28, effective July 15, 1988.

424.350.
Application for appointment as fiduciary. [Repealed.]

424.360.
Invitation to bid on municipal bonds.

Except in the case of:

Bonds issued for the purpose of facilitating the construction, renovation, or purchase of new or existing housing as provided by KRS

58.125

; or

Bonds issued and sold pursuant to any section of the Constitution or the Kentucky Revised Statutes providing for the sale of bonds at a private, negotiated sale;

no sale of general obligation bonds or revenue bonds of any governmental unit, political subdivision, or agency thereof shall be made until advertisements for bids are publicized.

Advertisements for bids may be publicized by:

Newspaper publication in the area constituted by the political subdivision or governmental unit and published to afford statewide notice; or

Posting a notice of sale to a nationally recognized electronic bidding system.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 26; 1960, ch. 168, § 1; 1984, ch. 157, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 259, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 210, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2019 ch. 35, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

424.370.
Judicial sale of real property.

Upon request made to the master commissioner by any person who will have a substantial interest in the proceeds of a judicial sale of real estate, the master commissioner shall cause the required advertisement of sale to be published in display form.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 42, § 27.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Enforcement of judgments, KRS ch. 426.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, Forfeiture and the Land Installment Contract: Sebastian v. Floyd,
72 Ky. L.J. 917 (1983-84).

424.380.
Failure to comply with publication requirements.

Any resolution, regulation, ordinance or other formal action of any public agency which is required to be published, that is adopted without compliance with the publication requirements of this chapter, shall be voidable by a court of competent jurisdiction. The Circuit Courts of this state shall have the jurisdiction to enforce the purposes of this chapter, by injunction or other appropriate order, upon application by any citizen of this state. The cost of all proceedings, including a reasonable fee for the attorney of the citizen bringing the action, shall be assessed against the unsuccessful party.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 430, § 8, effective July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Acts 1982, ch. 430, which amends this section and several other statutes relating to publication requirements of cities, is basically an amendment of the municipal publication requirements and does not affect the city budget process, financial matters in cities or matters relating to the administration of city finances. It gives a city a choice as to which of two devices relating to finances and expenditures must be published annually rather than requiring that they both be published and affects what a city publishes after the completion of the fiscal year, but does not affect the activities of a city during the fiscal year; it does not impair any vested rights.

OAG 82-353

.

As to its publication provisions for municipal governments, Acts 1982, ch. 430, effective July 15, 1982, is applicable to those municipal governments for the fiscal year July 1, 1981 to June 30, 1982.

OAG 82-353

.